nlp-tools/dict/ne_NP.aff
FLAG num
SFX 41 Y 157
SFX 41 0 नेमात्र ्
SFX 41 0 दारहेछौ ्
SFX 41 0 नेथियो ्
SFX 41 0 नुपरिरहेको ्
SFX 41 0 नेगर्दछ ्
SFX 41 0 नुहुन्न ्
SFX 41 0 नेछन् ्
SFX 41 0 नुपर्ला ्
SFX 41 0 नुपर्दछ ्
SFX 41 0 नुछ ्
SFX 41 0 नलाग्यो ्
SFX 41 0 नुभएनछ ्
SFX 41 0 नुभयो ्
SFX 41 0 नुभएर ्
SFX 41 0 नुभएको ्
SFX 41 0 नुभएन ्
SFX 41 0 नुभएका ्
SFX 41 0 नुभएछ ्
SFX 41 0 नुपर्दा ्
SFX 41 0 नुपर्दो ्
SFX 41 0 नुपर्नेछ ्
SFX 41 0 नुपर्थ्यो ्
SFX 41 0 नुपर्दैन ्
SFX 41 0 नुपर्दैनथ्यो ्
SFX 41 0 नुपरेर ्
SFX 41 0 नुपरे ्
SFX 41 0 नुपरेको ्
SFX 41 0 नुपरेन ्
SFX 41 0 नुपरेका ्
SFX 41 0 नुपर्नेबारे ्
SFX 41 0 नुपर्यो ्
SFX 41 0 नुपर्ने ्
SFX 41 0 नुपर्छ ्
SFX 41 0 नुपरेछ ्
SFX 41 0 नुपरे ्
SFX 41 0 नुपर्नेछ ्
SFX 41 0 नुहुने ्
SFX 41 0 नुहुन ्
SFX 41 0 नुहुँदै ्
SFX 41 0 नुहुँदा ्
SFX 41 0 नुहुन्थ्यो ्
SFX 41 0 नुहुँदैछ ्
SFX 41 0 नुहुँदैनथ्यो ्
SFX 41 0 नुहोस् ्
SFX 41 0 नुहोला ्
SFX 41 0 नुहुनेबारे ्
SFX 41 0 नुहुन्छ ्
SFX 41 0 नुहुनेछ ्
SFX 41 0 नुहुने ्
SFX 41 0 नुहुन ्
SFX 41 0 नुहुँदै ्
SFX 41 0 नुहुँदा ्
SFX 41 0 नुहुन्छ ्
SFX 41 0 नुहुनेछ ्
SFX 41 0 नुहुन्थ्यो ्
SFX 41 0 नुहुँदैन ्
SFX 41 0 नुहुँदैछ ्
SFX 41 0 नुहुँदैनथ्यो ्
SFX 41 0 नुहोस् ्
SFX 41 0 नुहोला ्
SFX 41 0 नुहुनेबारे ्
SFX 41 0 दोरहेछु ्
SFX 41 0 दोरहेछौ ्
SFX 41 0 दारहेछौँ ्
SFX 41 0 दोरहेछस् ्
SFX 41 0 दोरहेछ ्
SFX 41 0 नसक्यो ्
SFX 41 0 नसके ्
SFX 41 0 नसक्छ ्
SFX 41 0 नसकेछ ्
SFX 41 0 नसक्नेछ ्
SFX 41 0 नसक्नेछन् ्
SFX 41 0 नसक्नु ्
SFX 41 0 नसक्ने ्
SFX 41 0 नसक्दि ्
SFX 41 0 नसक्दो ्
SFX 41 0 नसक्छु ्
SFX 41 0 नसक्छौ ्
SFX 41 0 नसक्छस् ्
SFX 41 0 नसक्छौँ ्
SFX 41 0 नसक्छेस् ्
SFX 41 0 नसक्छन् ्
SFX 41 0 नसक्छिन् ्
SFX 41 0 नसक्नेछौँ ्
SFX 41 0 नसक्नेछौ ्
SFX 41 0 नसक्छ्यौ ्
SFX 41 0 नसक्छे ्
SFX 41 0 नसक्नेछ ्
SFX 41 0 नसक्नेछस् ्
SFX 41 0 नसक्थिस् ्
SFX 41 0 नसक्थ्यौ ्
SFX 41 0 नसक्नेछन् ्
SFX 41 0 नसक्थ्यौँ ्
SFX 41 0 नसक्थे ्
SFX 41 0 नसक्थ्यो ्
SFX 41 0 नसक्थि ्
SFX 41 0 नसक्थिन् ्
SFX 41 0 नसक्दैन ्
SFX 41 0 नसक्दैनौ ्
SFX 41 0 नसक्दैनौँ ्
SFX 41 0 नसक्दिनौ ्
SFX 41 0 नसक्दैनन् ्
SFX 41 0 नसक्नेछु ्
SFX 41 0 नसक्नेछौँ ्
SFX 41 0 नसक्दैनथ्यो ्
SFX 41 0 नसक्दैनथे ्
SFX 41 0 नसक्यौँ ्
SFX 41 0 नसक्यौ ्
SFX 41 0 नसकेनन् ्
SFX 41 0 नसकेर ्
SFX 41 0 नसकेन ्
SFX 41 0 नसकेनौ ्
SFX 41 0 नसकेनौँ ्
SFX 41 0 नसकेस् ्
SFX 41 0 नसकोस् ्
SFX 41 0 नसकेछ ्
SFX 41 0 नसकेछन् ्
SFX 41 0 नसकेछौ ्
SFX 41 0 नसकुन्जेल ्
SFX 41 0 नसकिन् ्
SFX 41 0 नसकिन ्
SFX 41 0 नसकिनस् ्
SFX 41 0 नसकिँन ्
SFX 41 0 नसकिनौ ्
SFX 41 0 नसकिनन् ्
SFX 41 0 नसकिस् ्
SFX 41 0 नसकि ्
SFX 41 0 नसकिनेछ ्
SFX 41 0 नसकिएला ्
SFX 41 0 नसकुन् ्
SFX 41 0 नसकिछस् ्
SFX 41 0 नसकिछन् ्
SFX 41 0 नसकिछ ्
SFX 41 0 नसकुँ ्
SFX 41 0 नसकेको ्
SFX 41 0 नसकेका ्
SFX 41 0 नसक्ला ्
SFX 41 0 नसक्नेबारे ्
SFX 41 ् िएछ ्
SFX 41 0 नसक्नुहुन्छ ्
SFX 41 0 नसक्नुभयो ्
SFX 41 0 नसक्नुहुन्थ्यो ्
SFX 41 0 नसकिएछ ्
SFX 41 0 नसक्दछ ् 
SFX 41 ् ाउ/42X ्
SFX 41 ् ाइ/43X ्
SFX 41 ् ि/43X ्
SFX 41 0 नुहुदै ्
SFX 41 0 नुहुदा ्
SFX 41 0 नुहुदैछ ्
SFX 41 0 नुहुदैनथ्यो ्
SFX 41 0 नुहुदै ्
SFX 41 0 नुहुदा ्
SFX 41 0 नुहुदैन ्
SFX 41 0 नुहुदैछ ्
SFX 41 0 नुहुदैनथ्यो ्
SFX 41 0 नसकु ्


SFX 42 Y 86
SFX 42 0 नेमात्र [उ] 
SFX 42 0 ँदैछन् [उ] 
SFX 42 0 नेथियो [उ] 
SFX 42 0 नेछिन् [उ] 
SFX 42 0 नलाग्यो [उ] 
SFX 42 0 नुभएनछ [उ] 
SFX 42 0 ँछन् [उ] 
SFX 42 0 ँछ [उ] 
SFX 42 0 नेछौँ [उ] 
SFX 42 0 नुहुन्न [उ] 
SFX 42 0 नुपर्दछ [उ] 
SFX 42 0 नुहुन्नथ्यो [उ] 
SFX 42 0 नुभयो [उ] 
SFX 42 0 नुभएर [उ]
SFX 42 0 नुभएको [उ]
SFX 42 0 नुभएन [उ]
SFX 42 0 नुभएका [उ]
SFX 42 0 नुभए [उ]
SFX 42 0 नुभएछ [उ]
SFX 42 0 नुपर्दा [उ]
SFX 42 0 नुपर्दो [उ]
SFX 42 0 नुपर्नेछ [उ]
SFX 42 0 नुपर्थ्यो [उ]
SFX 42 0 नुपर्दैन [उ]
SFX 42 0 नुपर्दैनथ्यो [उ]
SFX 42 0 नुपरेर [उ]
SFX 42 0 नुपरेको [उ]
SFX 42 0 नुपरेन [उ]
SFX 42 0 नुपर्न [उ]
SFX 42 0 नुपर्यो [उ]
SFX 42 0 नुपर्ने [उ]
SFX 42 0 नुपर्छ [उ]
SFX 42 0 नुपरेछ [उ]
SFX 42 0 नुपर्नेछ [उ]
SFX 42 0 नुहुने [उ]
SFX 42 0 नुहुन [उ]
SFX 42 0 नुहुँदै [उ]
SFX 42 0 नुहुँदा [उ]
SFX 42 0 नुहुन्थ्यो [उ]
SFX 42 0 नुहुँदैछ [उ]
SFX 42 0 नुहुँदैनथ्यो [उ]
SFX 42 0 नुहोस् [उ]
SFX 42 0 नुहोला [उ]
SFX 42 0 नुहुनेबारे [उ]
SFX 42 0 नुहुन्छ [उ]
SFX 42 0 नुहुनेछ [उ]
SFX 42 0 नुहुने [उ]
SFX 42 0 नुहुन [उ]
SFX 42 0 नुहुँदै [उ]
SFX 42 0 नुहुँदा [उ]
SFX 42 0 नुहुँदो [उ]
SFX 42 0 नुहुन्छ [उ]
SFX 42 0 नुहुनेछ [उ]
SFX 42 0 नुहुन्थ्यो [उ]
SFX 42 0 नुहुँदैन [उ]
SFX 42 0 नुहुँदैछ [उ]
SFX 42 0 नुहुँदैनथ्यो [उ]
SFX 42 0 नुहोस् [उ]
SFX 42 0 नुहोला [उ]
SFX 42 0 नुहुनेबारे [उ]
SFX 42 0 ँदोरहेछु [उ]
SFX 42 0 ँदारहेछौ [उ]
SFX 42 0 ँदोरहेछस् [उ]
SFX 42 0 ँदोरहेछ [उ]
SFX 42 0 ँदारहेछन् [उ]
SFX 42 0 ँदिरहिछिन् [उ]
SFX 42 0 दैछन् [उ]
SFX 42 0 छन् [उ]
SFX 42 0 छ [उ]
SFX 42 0 नेछौ [उ]
SFX 42 0 नुहुदै [उ]
SFX 42 0 नुहुदा [उ]
SFX 42 0 नुहुदैछ [उ]
SFX 42 0 नुहुदैनथ्यो [उ]
SFX 42 0 नुहुदै [उ]
SFX 42 0 नुहुदा [उ]
SFX 42 0 नुहुदो [उ]
SFX 42 0 नुहुदैन [उ]
SFX 42 0 नुहुदैछ [उ]
SFX 42 0 नुहुदैनथ्यो [उ]
SFX 42 0 दोरहेछु [उ]
SFX 42 0 दारहेछौ [उ]
SFX 42 0 दोरहेछस् [उ]
SFX 42 0 दोरहेछ [उ]
SFX 42 0 दारहेछन् [उ]
SFX 42 0 दिरहिछिन् [उ]
