nlp-tools/dict/ne_NP.dic
अग्ल्याउ/9,42
अट्/1,41
अड्/1,41
अड्याउ/9,42
अधकल्च्याउ/9,42
अफाल्/1,41
अरल्याउ/9,42
अर्मल्/1,41
अलग्याउ/9,42
अल्मल्याउ/9,42
आँट्/1,41
आउ/9,42
इतर्याउ/9,42
उँघ्/1,41
उकेल्/1,41
उगल्च्याउ/9,42
उगाल्/1,41
उघाउ/9,42
उछिन्/1,41
उजाउ/9,42
उठाउ/9,42
उड्/1,41
उध्राउ/9,42
उधिन्/1,41
उब्जाउ/9,42
उबार्/1,41
उभाउ/9,42
उमठ्/1,41
उम्टाउ/9,42
उमेठ्/1,41
उमेठ्याउ/9,42
उल्झाउ/9,42
ऐँचाउ/9,42
ओकल्/1,41
ओझाउ/9,42
ओढ्/1,41
ओल्छ्याउ/9,42
ओसाउ/9,42
ओसार्/1,41
कचल्ट्याउ/9,42
कठ्याउ/9,42
कथ्/1,41
कन्याउ/9,42
कमाउ/9,42
करेट्/1,41
करेटाउ/9,42
काट्/1,41
किच्/1,41
किच्याउ/9,42
कुँज्याउ/9,42
कुँढ्/1,41
कुँढाउ/9,42
कुच्याउ/9,42
कुथुङ्ग्‌र्याउ/9,42
कुप्र्याउ/9,42
कुर्/1,41
कुल्चाउ/9,42
कोचलाउ/9,42
कोचार्/1,41
कोतराउ/9,42
कोप्च्याउ/9,42
कोरल्/1,41
खकाल्/1,41
खट्काउ/9,42
खन्/1,41
खप्काउ/9,42
खम्साउ/9,42
खस्‌र्याउ/9,42
खसाल्/1,41
ख्याउ/9,42
खाम्/1,41
खिप्/1,41
खियाउ/9,42
खुट्/1,41
खुटाउ/9,42
खुम्च्याउ/9,42
खुल्क्याउ/9,42
खेपाउ/9,42
खेर्/1,41
खोकल्याउ/9,42
खोज्/1,41
खोजाउ/9,42
खोद्/1,41
खोलाउ/9,42
खोसाउ/9,42
खोसेल्/1,41
गँगर्याउ/9,42
गच्काउ/9,42
गढाउ/9,42
गप्फ्याउ/9,42
गम्/1,41
गराउ/9,42
गाँज्/1,41
गाड्/1,41
गिँड्/1,41
गिजलाउ/9,42
गिर्/1,41
गुँडुल्याउ/9,42
गुठुर्याउ/9,42
गुत्/1,41
गुथाउ/9,42
गुम्/1,41
गुमाउ/9,42
गोब्य्राउ/9,42
गोभ्/1,41
घट्/1,41
घटाउ/9,42
घमाउ/9,42
घस्राउ/9,42
घसेट्/1,41
घिच्याउ/9,42
घिस्याउ/9,42
घिसार्/1,41
घुङ्‌र्याउ/9,42
घुचेट्/1,41
घुर्/1,41
घुसमुन्ट्याउ/9,42
घेर्/1,41
घेराउ/9,42
घोच्/1,41
घोत्ल्याउ/9,42
घोल्/1,41
घोलाउ/9,42
चकार्/1,41
चड्काउ/9,42
चर्/1,41
चर्काउ/9,42
चलाउ/9,42
च्याउ/9,42
च्यात्/1,41
चाट्/1,41
चाल्/1,41
चिक्/1,41
चिथराउ/9,42
चिथोर्/1,41
चिमट्/1,41
चिम्ट्याउ/9,42
चिराउ/9,42
चिल्/1,41
चुँडाउ/9,42
चुच्याउ/9,42
चुट्/1,41
चुन्/1,41
चुनाउ/9,42
चुमुर्क्याउ/9,42
चुस्/1,41
चुसाउ/9,42
चेप्ट्याउ/9,42
चोख्याउ/9,42
चोथ्/1,41
चोबल्/1,41
चोबलाउ/9,42
चोर्/1,41
छँदाउ/9,42
छट्काउ/9,42
छन्काउ/9,42
छर्काउ/9,42
छसाउ/9,42
छाँट्/1,41
छाद्/1,41
छाप्/1,41
छास्/1,41
छिँवलाउ/9,42
छिचल्/1,41
छिट्/1,41
छिटाउ/9,42
छिप्/1,41
छिरलाउ/9,42
छिर्/1,41
छिलाउ/9,42
छुट्/1,41
छुवाउ/9,42
छेद्/1,41
छेपाउ/9,42
छोड्/1,41
छोल्/1,41
छोलाउ/9,42
जकाउ/9,42
जड्/1,41
जनाउ/9,42
जर्काउ/9,42
जल्/1,41
जाक्/1,41
जित्/1,41
जिताउ/9,42
जिस्क्याउ/9,42
जुठ्याउ/9,42
जुध्/1,41
जेल्/1,41
जेलाउ/9,42
जोत्/1,41
जोराउ/9,42
झट्काउ/9,42
झड्कार्/1,41
झनाउ/9,42
झपार्/1,41
झम्टाउ/9,42
झस्काउ/9,42
झाँक्/1,41
झार्/1,41
झिक्/1,41
झिजोलाउ/9,42
झुक्याउ/9,42
झुप्याउ/9,42
झुम्/1,41
झुल्काउ/9,42
झोक्‌र्याउ/9,42
झोड्/1,41
झोस्/1,41
टँक्याउ/9,42
टकराउ/9,42
टठमराउ/9,42
टर्याउ/9,42
टल्/1,41
टस्काउ/9,42
टाँग्/1,41
टार्/1,41
टिप्/1,41
टिम्काउ/9,42
टुक्राउ/9,42
टुहुर्याउ/9,42
टेर्/1,41
टोकसाउ/9,42
टोक्/1,41
ठँटाउ/9,42
ठङ्कार्/1,41
ठन्काउ/9,42
ठस्काउ/9,42
ठहराउ/9,42
ठ्यास्/1,41
ठान्/1,41
ठुस्क्याउ/9,42
ठेल्/1,41
ठेस्याउ/9,42
ठोस्/1,41
डँकाउ/9,42
डकाउ/9,42
डकार्/1,41
डढ्/1,41
डढ्याउ/9,42
डाँस्/1,41
डाढ्/1,41
डुक्राउ/9,42
डुब्/1,41
डेल्याउ/9,42
डोल्/1,41
ढँटाउ/9,42
ढाँट्/1,41
ढाल्/1,41
ढुँड्याउ/9,42
ढेप्/1,41
ढोगाउ/9,42
ढोल्/1,41
तङ्‌र्याउ/9,42
तछार्/1,41
तडाउ/9,42
तपाउ/9,42
तर्साउ/9,42
त्याग्/1,41
ताड्/1,41
ताप्/1,41
तिर्/1,41
तिराउ/9,42
तुर्/1,41
तुराउ/9,42
तेर्स्याउ/9,42
तोप्/1,41
तोपाउ/9,42
थच्याउ/9,42
थप्/1,41
थपाउ/9,42
थलाउ/9,42
थाक्/1,41
थाल्/1,41
थुँगाउ/9,42
थुक्/1,41
थुन्/1,41
थुप्राउ/9,42
थेग्/1,41
दँद्याउ/9,42
दगुर्/1,41
दङ्ग्याउ/9,42
दपाउ/9,42
दर्/1,41
दर्काउ/9,42
दहर्याउ/9,42
दाग्/1,41
दुख्/1,41
दुखाउ/9,42
देख्/1,41
दोक्च्याउ/9,42
धकाउ/9,42
धकेल्/1,41
धनाउ/9,42
धमिल्याउ/9,42
धर्/1,41
धसाउ/9,42
धसार्/1,41
धिक्कार्/1,41
धुइराउ/9,42
धुवाउ/9,42
नकचर्याउ/9,42
नकार्/1,41
नत्थ्याउ/9,42
नसाउ/9,42
नाच्/1,41
नार्/1,41
निकास्/1,41
निखार्/1,41
निछाउ/9,42
निछोट्/1,41
निदाउ/9,42
निफुल्काउ/9,42
निभ्/1,41
निम्ठ्याउ/9,42
निमोठ्/1,41
निल्/1,41
निस्काउ/9,42
नुहाउ/9,42
पँदाउ/9,42
पख्/1,41
पग्लाउ/9,42
पगार्/1,41
पच्/1,41
पछाउ/9,42
पट्/1,41
पटाउ/9,42
पड्/1,41
पतल्याउ/9,42
पतुर्/1,41
पदाउ/9,42
परपर्याउ/9,42
पर्/1,41
पराउ/9,42
पल्ट्/1,41
पस्काउ/9,42
पसाल्/1,41
पहिराउ/9,42
प्रस्ट्याउ/9,42
पाँद्/1,41
पाद्/1,41
पिँद्/1,41
पिउ/9,42
पिट्/1,41
पिराउ/9,42
पिस्/1,41
पिसोलाउ/9,42
पुग्/1,41
पुत्ताउ/9,42
पुल्/1,41
पुलाउ/9,42
पेस्/1,41
पेसाउ/9,42
पोत्/1,41
पोताउ/9,42
फँकाउ/9,42
फक्राउ/9,42
फकार्/1,41
फड्काउ/9,42
फतल्/1,41
फन्काउ/9,42
फलाउ/9,42
फस्/1,41
फसाउ/9,42
फाँज्/1,41
फाँद्/1,41
फाल्/1,41
फिर्/1,41
फिराउ/9,42
फुँक्/1,41
फुकाउ/9,42
फुट्/1,41
फुराउ/9,42
फुल्/1,41
फुसुल्ट्याउ/9,42
फेर्/1,41
फैलाउ/9,42
बँधाउ/9,42
बँधेर्/1,41
बगाउ/9,42
बघार्/1,41
बछाउ/9,42
बज्/1,41
बटुल्/1,41
बत्याउ/9,42
बथान्/1,41
बद्लाउ/9,42
बन्/1,41
बर्ख्याउ/9,42
बल्/1,41
बल्काउ/9,42
बहकाउ/9,42
ब्युँताउ/9,42
बाँड्/1,41
बाझ्/1,41
बास्/1,41
बिगबिगाउ/9,42
बिचार्/1,41
बिछाउ/9,42
बिटुल्/1,41
बिथोल्/1,41
बिथोलाउ/9,42
बिर्साउ/9,42
बिराज्/1,41
बिल्झाउ/9,42
बुकाउ/9,42
बुज्याउ/9,42
बुझ्/1,41
बुल्क्याउ/9,42
बेच्/1,41
बेधाउ/9,42
बेल्/1,41
बेहोराउ/9,42
बोक्/1,41
बोलाउ/9,42
भँडाउ/9,42
भकुर्/1,41
भजाउ/9,42
भन्/1,41
भनाउ/9,42
भल्काउ/9,42
भ्याउ/9,42
भाँड्/1,41
भाग्/1,41
भिड्/1,41
भिमलाउ/9,42
भुक्/1,41
भुकाउ/9,42
भुट्/1,41
भुल्काउ/9,42
भेटाउ/9,42
भेद्/1,41
मच्काउ/9,42
मडाउ/9,42
मथल्/1,41
मथाउ/9,42
मनाउ/9,42
मर्/1,41
मलाउ/9,42
माग्/1,41
मान्/1,41
मास्/1,41
मिचाउ/9,42
मिस्/1,41
मिसाउ/9,42
मुड्क्याउ/9,42
मुत्/1,41
मुन्ट्याउ/9,42
मुस्कुराउ/9,42
मेट्/1,41
मैल्याउ/9,42
मोस्/1,41
मौलाउ/9,42
रँधाउ/9,42
रगड्/1,41
रगेल्/1,41
रगेलाउ/9,42
रच्/1,41
रटाउ/9,42
रप्याउ/9,42
रसाउ/9,42
राँध्/1,41
राम्/1,41
रिटाउ/9,42
रुँग्/1,41
रुख्याउ/9,42
रुच्/1,41
रुमल्/1,41
रुमलाउ/9,42
रेल्/1,41
रेलाउ/9,42
रोप्/1,41
लखेट्/1,41
लखेटाउ/9,42
लघार्/1,41
लङ्गडाउ/9,42
लछेराउ/9,42
लड्/1,41
लडाउ/9,42
लत्राउ/9,42
लपेट्/1,41
लम्च्याउ/9,42
ललच्याउ/9,42
लाउ/9,42
लागिपर्/1,41
लुक्/1,41
लुकाउ/9,42
लुडबुड्याउ/9,42
लेख्/1,41
लेखाउ/9,42
लेसाउ/9,42
लेसार्/1,41
लोपराउ/9,42
लोस्याउ/9,42
वाक्/1,41
वैलाउ/9,42
अँगाल्/1,41
सँचाउ/9,42
सँभल्/1,41
सक्/1,41
सकाउ/9,42
सङाल्/1,41
सच्याउ/9,42
सड्काउ/9,42
सन्काउ/9,42
सपार्/1,41
सम्झाउ/9,42
सम्लाउ/9,42
समाल्/1,41
सर्/1,41
सर्सराउ/9,42
सह्राउ/9,42
स्याहार्/1,41
साँध्/1,41
साध्/1,41
सिँगार्/1,41
सिउ/9,42
सिक्/1,41
सिद्याउ/9,42
सिधार्/1,41
सुइँकाउ/9,42
सुत्/1,41
सुताउ/9,42
सुनाउ/9,42
सुभ्/1,41
सुम्ल्याउ/9,42
सुल्/1,41
सुल्टाउ/9,42
सोध्/1,41
हँकाउ/9,42
हट्/1,41
हटाउ/9,42
हडप्/1,41
हड्पाउ/9,42
हर्काउ/9,42
हस्काउ/9,42
हसुर्/1,41
हाँस्/1,41
हार्/1,41
हिक्/1,41
हिकाउ/9,42
हिस्याउ/9,42
हुर्काउ/9,42
हुल्/1,41
हेर्/1,41
हेलाउ/9,42
सट्/1,41
पाक्/1,41
उङ्/1,41
ओथाउ/9,42
उक्ताउ/9,42
भबाउ/9,42
सुसाउ/9,42
लजाउ/9,42
सर्माउ/9,42
घात्/1,41
व्याउ/9,42
ओड्/1,41
खँगार्/1,41
गोप्/1,41
छाँस्/1,41
उघिन्/1,41
दाब्/1,41
नोच्/1,41
पुर्याउ/9,42
फार्/1,41
फ्याँक्/1,41
वेध्/1,41
मोर्/1,41
सिमट्/1,41
सेप्/1,41
सोहोर्/1,41
कथुर्/1,41
न्याक्/1,41
परख्/1,41
घुर्क्याउ/9,42
बरार्ल्/1,41
चिताउ/9,42
जँच्/1,41
फलाँक्/1,41
दब्/1,41
गाँड्/1,41
सुँध्/1,41
खिहिर्याउ/9,42
फाब्/1,41
जाउ/9,42
अंगाल्/1,41
धकाल्/1,41
नुवाउ/9,42
लेराउ/9,42
स्विकार्/41,1
सुइकाउ/9,42
आक्/1,41
उघ्/1,41
ऐचाउ/9,42
कुड्/1,41
कुद्/1,41
खदाउ/9,42
खाद्/1,41
खुद्/1,41
गास्/1,41
गिडाउ/9,42
चुड्/1,41
छटाउ/9,42
छाद्/1,41
छिवल्/1,41
झाक्/1,41
झिजोलाउ/9,42
टाक्/1,41
टास्/1,41
डकाउ/9,42
डाक्/1,41
ढुड्/1,41
दजाउ/9,42
दाज्/1,41
पिद्/1,41
फकाउ/9,42
फाक्/1,41
फाड्/1,41
फुक्/1,41
बधेराउ/9,42
बाड्/1,41
बियाल्/1,41
रग्/1,41
रगाउ/9,42
रिध्/1,41
रुध्/1,41
सगेट्/1,41
सगेटाउ/9,42
सभार्/1,41
साच्/1,41
सिच्/1,41
सुइकाउ/9,42
हाप्/1,41
हिड्/1,41
खगार्/1,41
फेक्/1,41
घचेट्/1,41
फलाक्/1,41
सुध्/1,41
